California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 963, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.6. Insurance Information and Privacy Protection Act [791. - 791.29.]

791.

The purpose of this article is to establish standards for the collection, use and disclosure of information gathered in connection with insurance transactions by insurance institutions, agents or insurance-support organizations; to maintain a balance between the need for information by those conducting the business of insurance and the public’s need for fairness in insurance information practices, including the need to minimize intrusiveness; to establish a regulatory mechanism to enable natural persons to ascertain what information is being or has been collected about them in connection with insurance transactions and to have access to such information for the purpose of verifying or disputing its accuracy; to limit the disclosure of information collected in connection with insurance transactions; and to enable insurance applicants and policyholders to obtain the reasons for any adverse underwriting decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1214, Sec. 1.   Applicable October 1, 1981, as prescribed by Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.01.

(a) The obligations imposed by this article shall apply to those insurance institutions, agents or insurance-support organizations which, on or after October 1, 1981:

(1) In the case of life or disability insurance:

(A) Collect, receive or maintain information in connection with insurance transactions which pertains to natural persons who are residents of this state, or 

(B) Engage in insurance transactions with applicants, individuals or policyholders who are residents of this state.

(2) In the case of property or casualty insurance:

(A) Collect, receive or maintain information in connection with insurance transactions involving policies, contracts or certificates of insurance delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state, or

(B) Engage in insurance transactions involving policies, contracts or certificates of insurance delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state.

(b) The rights granted by this article shall extend to:

(1) In the case of life or disability insurance, the following persons who are residents of this state:

(A) Natural persons who are the subject of information collected, received or maintained in connection with insurance transactions.

(B) Applicants, individuals or policyholders who engage in or seek to engage in insurance transactions.

(2) In the case of property or casualty insurance, the following persons:

(A) Natural persons who are the subject of information collected, received or maintained in connection with insurance transactions involving policies, contracts or certificates of insurance delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state, and

(B) Applicants, individuals or policyholders who engage in or seek to engage in insurance transactions involving policies, contracts or certificates of insurance delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state.

(c) For purposes of this section, a person shall be considered a resident of this state if the person’s last known mailing address, as shown in the records of the insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization, is located in this state.

(d) This article shall not apply to any person or entity engaged in the business of title insurance as defined in Section 12340.3.

(e) This article shall not apply to a person or entity engaged in the business of a home protection company, as defined in Section 12740, which does not obtain or maintain personal information, as defined in this article, of its policyholders and applicants.

(f) Insurance institutions, agents, insurance support organizations or any insurance transaction subject to this article shall be exempt from Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of, and Sections 1785.20 and 1786.40 of, the Civil Code.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106) by Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 1981.   Note: This amendment (by Stats. 1981, Ch. 121) delayed the applicability date for Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) from July 1, 1981 to October 1, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

791.02.

As used in this act:

(a) (1) “Adverse underwriting decision” means any of the following actions with respect to insurance transactions involving insurance coverage that is individually underwritten:

(A) A declination of insurance coverage.

(B) A termination of insurance coverage.

(C) Failure of an agent to apply for insurance coverage with a specific insurance institution that the agent represents and that is requested by an applicant.

(D) In
 the case of a property or casualty insurance coverage:

(i) Placement by an insurance institution or agent of a risk with a residual market mechanism, with an unauthorized insurer, or with an insurance institution that provides insurance to other than preferred or standard risks, if in fact the placement is at other than a preferred or standard rate. An adverse underwriting decision, in case of placement with an insurance institution that provides insurance to other than preferred or standard risks, shall not include placement if the applicant or insured did not specify or apply for placement as a preferred or standard risk or placement with a particular company insuring preferred or standard risks, or

(ii) The charging of a higher rate on the basis of information which differs from that
 which the applicant or policyholder furnished.

(E) In the case of a life, health, or disability insurance coverage, an offer to insure at higher than standard rates.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), any of the following actions shall not be considered adverse underwriting decisions but the insurance institution or agent responsible for their occurrence shall nevertheless provide the applicant or policyholder with the specific reason or reasons for their occurrence:

(A) The termination of an individual policy form on a class or statewide basis.

(B) A declination of insurance coverage solely because coverage is not available on a class or statewide basis.

(C) The rescission of a policy.

(b) “Affiliate” or “affiliated” means a person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with another person.

(c) “Agent” means any person licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621), Chapter 5A (commencing with Section 1759), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1800), or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831).

(d) “Applicant” means any person who seeks to contract for insurance coverage other than a person seeking group insurance that is not individually underwritten.

(e) “Consumer report” means any written, oral, or other communication of information bearing on a natural person’s creditworthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living that is used or expected to be used in connection with an insurance transaction.

(f) “Consumer reporting agency” means any person who:

(1) Regularly engages, in whole or in part, in the practice of assembling or preparing consumer reports for a monetary fee.

(2) Obtains information primarily from sources other than insurance institutions.

(3) Furnishes consumer reports to
 other persons.

(g) “Control,” including the terms “controlled by” or “under common control with,” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise, unless the power is the result of an official position with or corporate office held by the person.

(h) “Declination of insurance coverage” means a denial, in whole or in part, by an insurance institution or agent of requested insurance coverage.

(i) “Individual” means any natural person who is any of the following:

(1) In the case of property or casualty insurance, is a past, present, or proposed named insured or certificate holder.

(2) In the case of life or disability insurance, is a past, present, or proposed principal insured or certificate holder.

(3) Is a past, present, or proposed policyowner.

(4) Is a past or present applicant.

(5) Is a past or present claimant.

(6) Derived, derives, or is proposed to derive insurance coverage under an insurance policy or certificate subject to this act.

(j) “Institutional source” means any person or governmental entity that provides information about an individual to an agent, insurance institution, or insurance-support organization, other than any of the following:

(1) An agent.

(2) The individual who is the subject of the information.

(3) A natural person acting in a personal capacity rather than in a business or professional capacity.

(k) “Insurance institution” means any corporation, association, partnership, reciprocal exchange, interinsurer, Lloyd’s insurer, fraternal benefit society, or other person engaged in the business of insurance. “Insurance institution” shall not include agents, insurance-support
 organizations, or health care service plans regulated pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act, Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(l) “Insurance-support organization” means:

(1) Any person who regularly engages, in whole or in part, in the business of assembling or collecting information about natural persons for the primary purpose of providing the information to an insurance institution or agent for insurance transactions, including either of the following:

(A) The furnishing of consumer reports or investigative consumer reports to an insurance institution or agent for use in connection with an insurance transaction.

(B) The collection of personal information from insurance institutions, agents, or other insurance-support organizations for the purpose of detecting or preventing fraud, material misrepresentation, or material nondisclosure in connection with insurance underwriting or insurance claim activity.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the following persons shall not be considered “insurance-support organizations”: agents, governmental institutions, insurance institutions, medical care institutions, medical professionals, and peer review committees.

(m) “Insurance transaction” means any transaction involving insurance primarily for personal, family, or household needs rather than business or professional needs that entails either of
 the
 following:

(1) The determination of an individual’s eligibility for an insurance coverage, benefit, or payment.

(2) The servicing of an insurance application, policy, contract, or certificate.

(n) “Investigative consumer report” means a consumer report or portion thereof in which information about a natural person’s character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living is obtained through personal interviews with the person’s neighbors, friends, associates, acquaintances, or others who may have knowledge concerning those items of information.

(o) “Medical care institution” means any facility or institution that is
 licensed to provide health care services to natural persons, including, but not limited to, hospitals, skilled nursing facilities, home health agencies, medical clinics, rehabilitation agencies, and public health agencies.

(p) “Medical professional” means any person licensed or certified to provide health care services to natural persons,
 including, but not limited to, a physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, physical or occupational therapist, psychiatric social worker, clinical dietitian, clinical psychologist, chiropractor, pharmacist, or speech therapist.

(q) “Medical record information” means personal information that is both of the following:

(1) Relates to an individual’s physical or mental condition, medical history, or medical treatment.

(2) Is obtained from a medical professional or medical care institution, from the individual, or from the individual’s spouse, parent, or legal guardian.

(r) “Person” means any natural person, corporation, association, partnership,
 limited liability company, or other legal entity.

(s) “Personal information” means any individually identifiable information gathered in connection with an insurance transaction from which judgments can be made about an individual’s character, habits, avocations, finances, occupation, general reputation, credit, health, or any other personal characteristics. “Personal information” includes an individual’s name and address and “medical record information” but does not include “privileged information.”

(t) “Policyholder” means any person who is any of the following:

(1) In the case of individual property or casualty insurance, is a present named insured.

(2) In the
 case of individual life or disability insurance, is a present policyowner.

(3) In the case of group insurance, which is individually underwritten, is a present group certificate holder.

(u) “Pretext interview” means an interview whereby a person, in an attempt to obtain information about a natural person, performs one or more of the following acts:

(1) Pretends to be someone they are not.

(2) Pretends to represent a person they are not in fact
 representing.

(3) Misrepresents the true purpose of the interview.

(4) Refuses to identify who they are upon request.

(v) “Privileged information” means any individually identifiable information that both:

(1) Relates to a claim for insurance benefits or a civil or criminal proceeding involving an individual.

(2) Is collected in connection with or in reasonable anticipation of a claim for insurance benefits or civil or criminal proceeding involving an individual. However, information otherwise meeting the requirements of this division shall nevertheless be considered “personal
 information” under this act if it is disclosed in violation of Section 791.13.

(w) “Residual market mechanism” means the California FAIR Plan Association, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10101) of Part 1 of Division 2, and the assigned risk plan, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 3 of Division 2.

(x) “Termination of insurance coverage” or “termination of an insurance policy” means either a cancellation or nonrenewal of an insurance policy, in whole or in part, for any reason other than the failure to pay a premium as required by the policy.

(y) “Unauthorized insurer” means an insurance institution that has not been granted a certificate of authority by the director to transact the business of insurance
 in this state.

(z) “Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner.

(aa) “Confidential communications request” means a request by an insured covered under a health insurance policy that insurance communications containing medical information be communicated to the insured at a specific mail or email address or specific telephone number, as designated by the insured.

(ab) “Protected individual” means any adult insured covered under a health insurance policy or a minor who can consent to a health care service without the consent of a parent or legal guardian, pursuant to state or federal law. “Protected individual” does not include an individual that lacks the capacity to give informed consent for health care pursuant
 to Section 813 of the Probate Code.

(ac) “Sensitive services” means all health care services related to mental or behavioral health, sexual and reproductive health, sexually transmitted infections, substance use disorder, gender affirming care, and intimate partner violence, and includes services described in Sections 6924, 6925, 6926, 6927, 6928, 6929, and 6930 of the Family Code, and Sections 121020 and 124260 of the Health and Safety Code, obtained by a patient of any age at or above the minimum age specified for consenting to the service specified in the section.

(ad) “Medical information” means any individually identifiable information, in electronic or physical form, in possession of or derived from a provider of health care, health insurer, pharmaceutical company, or
 contractor regarding a patient’s medical history, mental or physical condition, or treatment. “Individually identifiable” means that the medical information includes or contains any element of personal identifying information sufficient to allow identification of the individual, such as the patient’s name, address, electronic mail address, telephone number, or social security number, or other information that, alone or in combination with other publicly available information, reveals the individual’s identity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 190, Sec. 5.   (AB 1184)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

791.03.

No insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization shall use or authorize the use of pretext interviews to obtain information in connection with an insurance transaction; provided, however, that a pretext interview may be undertaken to obtain information from a person or institution that does not have a generally or statutorily recognized privileged relationship with the person to whom the information relates for the purpose of investigating a claim where there is a reasonable basis for suspecting criminal activity, fraud, material misrepresentation or material nondisclosure in connection with a claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106, Sec. 2.   Effective June 29, 1981.   Amending action operative June 30, 1981, pursuant to Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 3.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.04.

(a) An insurance institution or agent shall provide a notice of information practices to all applicants or policyholders in connection with insurance transactions as provided below:

(1) In the case of a written application for insurance, a notice shall be provided no later than:

(A) At the time of the delivery of the insurance policy or certificate when personal information is collected only from the applicant, an insured under the policy, or from public records; or

(B) At the time the collection of personal information is initiated when personal information is collected from a source other than the applicant, an insured under the policy, or public records.

(2) In the case of a policy renewal, a notice shall be provided no later than the policy renewal date or the date upon which policy renewal is confirmed, except that no notice shall be required in connection with a policy renewal if either of the following applies:

(A) Personal information is collected only from the policyholder, an insured under the policy, or from public records.

(B) A notice meeting the requirements of this section has been given within the previous 24 months.

(3) In the case of a policy reinstatement or change in insurance benefits, a notice shall be provided no later than the time a request for a policy reinstatement or change in insurance benefits is received by the insurance institution, except that no notice shall be required if personal information is collected only from the policyholder, an insured under the policy, or from public records or if a notice meeting the requirements of this section has been given within the previous 24 months.

(b) The notice required by subdivision (a) shall be in writing and shall state all of the following:

(1) Whether personal information may be collected from persons other than the individual or individuals proposed for coverage.

(2) The types of personal information that may be collected and the types of sources and investigative techniques that may be used to collect such information.

(3) The types of disclosures identified in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (i), (k), (l), and (n) of Section 791.13 and the circumstances under which the disclosures may be made without prior authorization, except that only those circumstances need be described which occur with such frequency as to indicate a general business practice.

(4) A description of the rights established under Sections 791.08 and 791.09 and the manner in which the rights may be exercised.

(5) That information obtained from a report prepared by an insurance-support organization may be retained by the insurance-support organization and disclosed to other persons.

(c) In lieu of the notice prescribed in subdivision (b), the insurance institution or agent may provide an abbreviated notice informing the applicant or policyholder of the following:

(1) Personal information may be collected from persons other than the individual or individuals proposed for coverage.

(2) Such information as well as other personal or privileged information subsequently collected by the insurance institution or agent may in certain circumstances be disclosed to third parties without authorization.

(3) A right of access and correction exists with respect to all personal information collected.

(4) The notice prescribed in subdivision (b) will be furnished to the applicant or policyholder upon request.

(d) The obligations imposed by this section upon an insurance institution or agent may be satisfied by another insurance institution or agent authorized to act on its behalf.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106, Sec. 4.   Effective June 29, 1981.   Repealing and adding actions operative June 30, 1981, pursuant to Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 3.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.045.

(a) (1) In addition to the notice required by Section 791.04, an insurance institution or agent shall provide a clear and conspicuous notice to customers that accurately reflects its privacy policies and practices not less than annually during the continuation of the customer relationship. For purposes of this section, “annually” means at least once in any period of 12 consecutive months during which that relationship exists. An insurance institution or agent may define the period of 12 consecutive months, but shall apply it to the customer on a consistent basis.

(2) A notice required pursuant to this section shall comply with Section 2689.7 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) (1) The notices required pursuant to Section 791.04 and this section may be combined into a single notice or provided as separate notices, as long as the requirements of Section 791.04 and this section are met.

(2) If the insurance institution or agent uses a separate, standard privacy notice in addition to the notices required pursuant to Section 791.04 and this section, the notices required pursuant to Section 791.04 and this section shall clearly state that any rights a consumer, claimant, or beneficiary may have as described in these are not limited by the standard privacy notice that the insurance institution or agent also uses.

(c) An insurance institution or agent shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The insurance institution or agent does not provide medical record, personal, or privileged information to a nonaffiliated third party pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 791.13.

(2) The insurance institution or agent additionally provides, as part of an abbreviated notice provided pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 791.04, the internet website address of the insurance institution’s or agent’s complete privacy notice that complies with subdivision (a) and informs the consumer of each of the following rights in a clear and conspicuous manner:

(A) The right to submit a written request to access, correct, amend, or delete the consumer’s personal information and the manner in which the right may be exercised, including the contact information and the mailing address, internet website address, or both, where the
 consumer may submit a request.

(B) The right to receive a response within 30 business days of the consumer submitting a request to access, correct, amend, or delete their personal information.

(C) If the insurance institution refuses the consumer’s request, the right to file a statement regarding what the consumer believes to be accurate and fair information and why the consumer disagrees with the insurance institution’s refusal.

(3) The insurance institution’s or agent’s policies and practices about disclosing personal or privileged information have not changed from the previous notice provided pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) An insurance institution or agent is not required to provide a notice pursuant to subdivision (a) to a former customer with
 whom it no longer has a continuing relationship.

(e) The terms used in this section have the same meaning as defined in Section 2689.4 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (SB 793)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

791.05.

An insurance institution or agent shall clearly specify those questions designed to obtain information solely for marketing or research purposes from an individual in connection with an insurance transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106, Sec. 5.   Effective June 29, 1981.   Amending action operative June 30, 1981, pursuant to Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 3.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.06.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization may utilize as its disclosure authorization form in connection with insurance transactions a form or statement which authorizes the disclosure of personal or privileged information about an individual to the insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization unless the form or statement:

(a) Is written in plain language.

(b) Is dated.

(c) Specifies the types of persons authorized to disclose information about the individual.

(d) Specifies the nature of the information authorized to be disclosed.

(e) Names the insurance institution or agent and identifies by generic reference representatives of the insurance institution to whom the individual is authorizing information to be disclosed.

(f) Specifies the purposes for which the information is collected.

(g) Specifies the length of time the authorization shall remain valid, which shall be no longer than:

(1) In the case of authorizations signed for the purpose of collecting information in connection with an application for an insurance policy, a policy reinstatement or a request for change in policy benefits:

(A) Thirty months from the date the authorization is signed if the application or request involves life, health or disability insurance; or

(B) One year from the date the authorization is signed if the application or request involves property or casualty insurance.

(2) In the case of authorizations signed for the purpose of collecting information in connection with a claim for benefits under an insurance policy:

(A) The term of coverage of the policy if the claim is for a health insurance benefit; or

(B) The duration of the claim if the claim is not for a health insurance benefit; or

(C) The duration of all claims processing activity performed in connection with all claims for benefits made by any person entitled to benefits under a nonprofit hospital service contract.

(h) Advises the individual or a person authorized to act on behalf of the individual that the individual or the individual’s authorized representative is entitled to receive a copy of the authorization form.

(i) This section shall not be construed to require any authorization for the receipt of personal or privileged information about an individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106, Sec. 6.   Effective June 29, 1981.   Amending action operative June 30, 1981, pursuant to Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 3.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.07.

(a) No insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization may prepare or request an investigative consumer report about an individual in connection with an insurance transaction involving an application for insurance, a policy renewal, a policy reinstatement or a change in insurance benefits unless the insurance institution or agent informs the individual of the following: 

(1) That he or she may request to be interviewed in connection with the preparation of the investigative consumer report, and

(2) That upon a request pursuant to Section 791.08, he or she is entitled to receive a copy of the investigative consumer report.

(b) If an investigative consumer report is to be prepared by an insurance institution or agent, the insurance institution or agent shall institute reasonable procedures to conduct a personal interview requested by an individual.

(c) If an investigative consumer report is to be prepared by an insurance-support organization, the insurance institution or agent desiring such report shall inform the insurance-support organization whether a personal interview has been requested by the individual. The insurance-support organization shall institute reasonable procedures to conduct such interviews, if requested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106, Sec. 7.   Effective June 29, 1981.   Amending action operative June 30, 1981, pursuant to Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 3.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.08.

(a) If any individual, after proper identification, submits a written request to an insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization for access to recorded personal information about the individual which is reasonably described by the individual and reasonably locatable and retrievable by the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization, the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization shall within 30 business days from the date such request is received:

(1) Inform the individual of the nature and substance of such recorded personal information in writing, by telephone or by other oral communication, whichever the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization prefers;

(2) Permit the individual to see and copy, in person, such recorded personal information pertaining to him or her or to obtain a copy of such recorded personal information by mail, whichever the individual prefers, unless such recorded personal information is in coded form, in which case an accurate translation in plain language shall be provided in writing;

(3) Disclose to the individual the identity, if recorded, of those persons to whom the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization has disclosed such personal information within two years prior to such request, and if the identity is not recorded, the names of those insurance institutions, agents, insurance-support organizations or other persons to whom such information is normally disclosed; and

(4) Provide the individual with a summary of the procedures by which he or she may request correction, amendment or deletion of recorded personal information. 

(b) Any personal information provided pursuant to subdivision (a) above shall identify the source of the information if such source is an institutional source.

(c) Medical record information supplied by a medical care institution or medical professional and requested under subdivision (a), together with the identity of the medical professional or medical care institution which provided such information, shall be supplied either directly to the individual or to a medical professional designated by the individual and licensed to provide medical care with respect to the condition to which the information relates, whichever the individual prefers. Mental health record information shall be supplied directly to the individual, pursuant to this section, only with the approval of the qualified professional person with treatment responsibility for the condition to which the information relates. If it elects to disclose the information to a medical professional designated by the individual, the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization shall notify the individual, at the time of the disclosure, that it has provided the information to the medical professional. 

(d) Except for personal information provided under Section 791.10, an insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization may charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs incurred in providing a copy of recorded personal information to individuals.

(e) The obligations imposed by this section upon an insurance institution or agent may be satisfied by another insurance institution or agent authorized to act on its behalf. With respect to the copying and disclosure of recorded personal information pursuant to a request under subdivision (a), an insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization may make arrangements with an insurance-support organization or a consumer reporting agency to copy and disclose recorded personal information on its behalf.

(f) The rights granted to individuals in this section shall extend to all natural persons to the extent information about them is collected and maintained by an insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization in connection with an insurance transaction. The rights granted to all natural persons by this subdivision shall not extend to information about them that relates to and is collected in connection with or in reasonable anticipation of a claim or civil or criminal proceeding involving them.

(g) For purposes of this section, the term “insurance-support organization” does not include “consumer reporting agency”.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1132, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

791.09.

(a) Within 30 business days from the date of receipt of a written request from an individual to correct, amend or delete any recorded personal information about the individual within its possession, an insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization shall either:

(1) Correct, amend or delete the portion of the recorded personal information in dispute; or

(2) Notify the individual of:

(A) Its refusal to make such correction, amendment or deletion.

(B) The reasons for the refusal.

(C) The individual’s right to file a statement as provided in subdivision (c). 

(b) If the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization corrects, amends or deletes recorded personal information in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization shall so notify the individual in writing and furnish the correction, amendment or fact of deletion to:

(1) Any person specifically designated by the individual who may have, within the preceding two years, received such recorded personal information.

(2) Any insurance-support organization whose primary source of personal information is insurance institutions if the insurance-support organization has systematically received such recorded personal information from the insurance institution within the preceding seven years; provided, however, that the correction, amendment or fact of deletion need not be furnished if the insurance-support organization no longer maintains recorded personal information about the individual.

(3) Any insurance-support organization that furnished the personal information that has been corrected, amended or deleted.

(c) Whenever an individual disagrees with an insurance institution’s, agent’s or insurance-support organization’s refusal to correct, amend or delete recorded personal information, the individual shall be permitted to file with the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization:

(1) A concise statement setting forth what the individual thinks is the correct, relevant or fair information.

(2) A concise statement of the reasons why the individual disagrees with the insurance institution’s, agent’s or insurance-support organization’s refusal to correct, amend or delete recorded personal information.

(d) In the event an individual files either statement as described in subdivision (c), the insurance institution, agent or support organization shall:

(1) File the statement with the disputed personal information and provide a means by which anyone reviewing the disputed personal information will be made aware of the individual’s statement and have access to it.

(2) In any subsequent disclosure by the insurance institution, agent or support organization of the recorded personal information that is the subject of disagreement, clearly identify the matter or matters in dispute and provide the individual’s statement along with the recorded personal information being disclosed. 

(3) Furnish the statement to the persons and in the manner specified in subdivision (b).

(e) The rights granted to individuals in this section shall extend to all natural persons to the extent information about them is collected and maintained by an insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization in connection with an insurance transaction. The rights granted to all natural persons by this subdivision shall not extend to information about them that relates to and is collected in connection with or in reasonable anticipation of a claim or civil or criminal proceeding involving them.

(f) For purposes of this section, the term “insurance-support organization” does not include “consumer reporting agency”.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106, Sec. 9.   Effective June 29, 1981.   Amending action operative June 30, 1981, pursuant to Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 3.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Sections 791.01 and 791.23.)
-------------------------------------------

791.10.

(a) In the event of an adverse underwriting decision the insurance institution or agent responsible for the decision shall:

(1) Either provide the applicant, policyholder, or individual proposed for coverage with the specific reason or reasons for the adverse underwriting decision in writing or, except as provided in subdivision (e), advise the person that upon written request he or she may receive the specific reason or reasons in writing.

(2) Provide the applicant, policyholder or individual proposed for coverage with a summary of the rights established under subdivision (b) and Sections 791.08 and 791.09.

(b) Upon receipt of a written request within 90 business days from the date of the mailing of notice or other communication of an adverse underwriting decision to an applicant, policyholder or individual proposed for coverage, the insurance institution or agent shall furnish to such person within 21 business days from the date of receipt of such written request:

(1) The specific reason or reasons for the adverse underwriting decision, in writing, if such information was not initially furnished in writing pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) The specific items of personal and privileged information that support those reasons; provided, however:
